Hawaii statutes.
§291-30 Spotlights. No
spotlight shall be used in any city, town, or village, and no spotlight shall
be so used as to shine in the eyes of the drivers of approaching passing
vehicles, and when used every spotlight shall be turned off not less than two hundred
feet from an approaching vehicle. [RL 1945, pt of §11707; RL 1955, §311-12; HRS
§291-30]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next